Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.978, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Penalties. (a) If a person refuses or neglects to obey any lawful direction of the legislative auditor, a deputy or assistant, or withholds any information, book, record, paper or other document called for by the legislative auditor for the purpose of examination, after having been lawfully required by order or subpoena, upon application by the auditor, a judge of the district court in the county where the order or subpoena was made returnable shall compel obedience or punish disobedience as for contempt, as in the case of a similar order or subpoena issued by the court. (b) A person who swears falsely concerning any matter stated under oath is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text begin (c) A public officer or employee, as defined in section 609.415, subdivision 1, who provides documents or other information to the legislative auditor knowing that the documents or other information are false in any material respect is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and subject to suspension without pay or dismissal for just cause. new text end new text begin (d) A public officer or employee who violates paragraph (c) a second or subsequent time may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of $5,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.43, is amended to read: 609.43 MISCONDUCT OF PUBLIC OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE. new text begin (a) new text end A public officer or employee who does any of the following, for which no other sentence is specifically provided by law, may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both: (1) intentionally fails or refuses to perform a known mandatory, nondiscretionary, ministerial duty of the office or employment within the time or in the manner required by law; or (2) in the capacity of such officer or employee, does an act knowing it is in excess of lawful authority or knowing it is forbidden by law to be done in that capacity; or (3) under pretense or color of official authority intentionally and unlawfully injures another in the other's person, property, or rights; or (4) in the capacity of such officer or employee, makes a return, certificate, official report, or other like document having knowledge it is false in any material respect. new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) a second or subsequent time may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of $5,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609A.015, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligibility; certain criminal proceedings. (a) A person is eligible for a grant of expungement relief if the person: (1) was convicted of a qualifying offense; (2) has not been convicted of a new offense, other than an offense that would be a petty misdemeanor, in Minnesota: (i) during the applicable waiting period immediately following discharge of the disposition or sentence for the crime; or (ii) during the applicable waiting period immediately preceding a subsequent review performed pursuant to subdivision 5, paragraph (a); and (3) is not charged with an offense, other than an offense that would be a petty misdemeanor, in Minnesota at the time the person reaches the end of the applicable waiting period or at the time of a subsequent review. (b) As used in this subdivision, "qualifying offense" means a conviction for: (1) any petty misdemeanor offense other than a violation of a traffic regulation relating to the operation or parking of motor vehicles; (2) any misdemeanor offense other than: (i) section 169A.20 under the terms described in section 169A.27 (fourth-degree driving while impaired); (ii) section 518B.01, subdivision 14 (violation of an order for protection); (iii) section 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); (iv) section 609.2242 (domestic assault); (v) section 609.746 (interference with privacy); (vi) section 609.748 (violation of a harassment restraining order); (vii) section 609.78 (interference with emergency call); (viii) section 609.79 (obscene or harassing phone calls); (ix) section 617.23 (indecent exposure); or (x) section 629.75 (violation of domestic abuse no contact order); (3) any gross misdemeanor offense other than: new text begin (i) section 3.978, subdivision 3 (penalties); new text end deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end section 169.13, subdivision 1, if the person causes great bodily harm or death to another (reckless driving resulting in great bodily harm or death); deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end section 169A.25 (second-degree driving while impaired); deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end section 169A.26 (third-degree driving while impaired); deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end section 518B.01, subdivision 14 (violation of an order for protection); deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end section 609.2113, subdivision 3 (criminal vehicular operation); deleted text begin (vi)deleted text end new text begin (vii)new text end section 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); deleted text begin (vii)deleted text end new text begin (viii)new text end section 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); deleted text begin (viii)deleted text end new text begin (ix)new text end section 609.2242 (domestic assault); deleted text begin (ix)deleted text end new text begin (x)new text end section 609.233 (criminal neglect); deleted text begin (x)deleted text end new text begin (xi)new text end section 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); deleted text begin (xi)deleted text end new text begin (xii)new text end section 609.377 (malicious punishment of child); new text begin (xiii) section 609.43 (misconduct of public officer or employee); new text end deleted text begin (xii)deleted text end new text begin (xiv)new text end section 609.485 (escape from custody); deleted text begin (xiii)deleted text end new text begin (xv)new text end section 609.498 (tampering with witness); deleted text begin (xiv)deleted text end new text begin (xvi)new text end section 609.582, subdivision 4 (burglary in the fourth degree); deleted text begin (xv)deleted text end new text begin (xvii)new text end section 609.746 (interference with privacy); deleted text begin (xvi)deleted text end new text begin (xviii)new text end section 609.748 (violation of a harassment restraining order); deleted text begin (xvii)deleted text end new text begin (xix)new text end section 609.749 (harassment; stalking); deleted text begin (xviii)deleted text end new text begin (xx)new text end section 609.78 (interference with emergency call); deleted text begin (xix)deleted text end new text begin (xxi)new text end section 617.23 (indecent exposure); deleted text begin (xx)deleted text end new text begin (xxii)new text end section 617.261 (nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images); or deleted text begin (xxi)deleted text end new text begin (xxiii)new text end section 629.75 (violation of domestic abuse no contact order); or (4) any felony offense listed in section 609A.02, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), other than: (i) section 152.023, subdivision 2 (possession of a controlled substance in the third degree); (ii) 152.024, subdivision 2 (possession of a controlled substance in the fourth degree); (iii) section 609.485, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (2) or (4) (escape from civil commitment for mental illness); (iv) section 609.582, subdivision 3, paragraph (a) (burglary in the third degree; other than trespass); or (v) section 609.746, subdivision 1, paragraph (g) (interference with privacy; subsequent violation or minor victim). (c) As used in this subdivision, "applicable waiting period" means: (1) if the offense was a petty misdemeanor, two years since discharge of the sentence; (2) if the offense was a misdemeanor, two years since discharge of the sentence for the crime; (3) if the offense was a gross misdemeanor, three years since discharge of the sentence for the crime; (4) if the offense was a felony violation of section 152.025, four years since the discharge of the sentence for the crime; and (5) if the offense was any other felony, five years since discharge of the sentence for the crime. (d) Felony offenses deemed to be a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor pursuant to section 609.13, subdivision 1, remain ineligible for expungement under this section. Gross misdemeanor offenses ineligible for a grant of expungement under this section remain ineligible if deemed to be for a misdemeanor pursuant to section 609.13, subdivision 2. (e) The service requirements in section 609A.03, subdivision 8, do not apply to any expungements ordered under this subdivision. (f) An expungement order does not apply to records held by the commissioners of children, youth, and families; health; and human services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 628.26, is amended to read: 628.26 LIMITATIONS. (a) Indictments or complaints for any crime resulting in the death of the victim may be found or made at any time after the death of the person killed. (b) Indictments or complaints for a violation of section 609.25 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense. (c) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.282 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense if the victim was under the age of 18 at the time of the offense. (d) Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.282 where the victim was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense, or 609.42, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within six years after the commission of the offense. (e) Indictments or complaints for violation of sections 609.322, 609.342 to 609.345, and 609.3458 may be found or made at any time after the commission of the offense. (f) Indictments or complaints for a violation of section 609.561 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within ten years after the commission of the offense. new text begin (g) Indictments or complaints for a violation of sections 3.978, subdivision 3, and 609.43 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within ten years after the commission of the offense. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Indictments or complaints for violation of sections 609.466 and 609.52, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), item (iii), shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within six years after the commission of the offense. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.2335, 609.52, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), items (i) and (ii), (4), (15), or (16), 609.631, or 609.821, where the value of the property or services stolen is more than $35,000, or for violation of section 609.527 where the offense involves eight or more direct victims or the total combined loss to the direct and indirect victims is more than $35,000, shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end Except for violations relating to false material statements, representations or omissions, indictments or complaints for violations of section 609.671 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end Indictments or complaints for violation of sections 609.562 and 609.563, shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within five years after the commission of the offense. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end Indictments or complaints for violation of section 609.746 shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within the later of three years after the commission of the offense or three years after the offense was reported to law enforcement authorities. deleted text begin (l)deleted text end new text begin (m)new text end In all other cases, indictments or complaints shall be found or made and filed in the proper court within three years after the commission of the offense. deleted text begin (m)deleted text end new text begin (n)new text end The limitations periods contained in this section shall exclude any period of time during which the defendant was not an inhabitant of or usually resident within this state. deleted text begin (n)deleted text end new text begin (o)new text end The limitations periods contained in this section for an offense shall not include any period during which the alleged offender participated under a written agreement in a pretrial diversion program relating to that offense. deleted text begin (o)deleted text end new text begin (p)new text end The limitations periods contained in this section shall not include any period of time during which physical evidence relating to the offense was undergoing DNA analysis, as defined in section 299C.155, unless the defendant demonstrates that the prosecuting or law enforcement agency purposefully delayed the DNA analysis process in order to gain an unfair advantage. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date and to crimes committed before that date if the limitations period for the crime did not expire before August 1, 2026. new text end